Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2629
Proceedings subsequent
to appointment; venue.

(a) Unless
otherwise provided in the Nebraska Uniform Adult Guardianship and Protective
Proceedings Jurisdiction Act, the court where the ward resides
has concurrent jurisdiction with the court which appointed the guardian, or
in which acceptance of a testamentary appointment was filed, over resignation,
removal, accounting, and other proceedings relating to the guardianship.

(b) Unless otherwise provided in the Nebraska
Uniform Adult Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Jurisdiction Act, if the
court located where the ward resides is not the court in which acceptance
of appointment is filed, the court in which proceedings subsequent to appointment
are commenced shall in all appropriate cases notify the other court, in this
or another state, and after consultation with that court determine whether
to retain jurisdiction or transfer the proceedings to the other court, whichever
may be in the best interest of the ward. A copy of any order accepting a resignation
or removing a guardian shall be sent to the court in which acceptance of appointment
is filed.

(c) Any action or proposed action by a guardian may be challenged
at any time by any interested person.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 247, UPC § 5-313;

Laws 1997, LB 466, § 12;

Laws 2011, LB157, § 40.

Nebraska Uniform Adult Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Jurisdiction Act, see section 30-3901.